DI-268

DIAGNOSTICS -

ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XP-03

DTC

C 1251 / 51

Hydraulic Brake Booster Pump Motor
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

Either of the following 1. or 2. is detected:

1. After turning the ignition switch ON, the current of more
than 30 A flows to the motor for more than 1 sec.

2. Atfter turning the ignition switch ON, less than 7 A
change in current is detected more than 3 times in a low
when the motor is ON.

C1251/ 51

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

DI-269
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PR

OCEDURE

1 Check operation of hydraulic brake booster pump motor.
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Connect battery positive @ lead to BM1 or BM2 terminal and
battery negative © lead to EM1 or EM2 terminal of the hydraulic
brake booster (pump motor) connector.
OK:
The operation sound of the pump motor should be
heard.
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Go to step 4.
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2 | Check hydraulic brake booster resistance.
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check resistance between terminals MT+ and MT-, BM1 and
MT, BM2 and MTT, EM1 and MT+, EM2 and MT+ of the hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

30-36Q
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Replace the hydraulic brake booster assembly.

3 | Check for open circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic brake boost-
er (MT+, MT-) and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).
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Repair or replace harness or connector.
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Check and replace skid control ECU.

4 | Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic
brake booster and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG> Replace wire harness.

@

5 | Check hydraulic brake booster pump motor (See Pub. No. RM793E on page
BR-7).

NG> Replace hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

@

Replace hydraulic brake booster.
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